Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4262.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 1. For the purposes of this act, the definitions in section 3 of the event online ticket sales act apply to the use of those terms in this act. Sec. 3. The attorney general may investigate a claim that a person has violated the event online ticket sales act. Sec. 5. (1) A person that violates the event online ticket sales act is subject to a civil fine of not more than $5,000.00. A fine collected must be deposited in the general fund. (2) Each ticket acquired in violation of the event online ticket sales act constitutes a separate violation for the purpose of assessing a civil fine under this section. Sec. 7. (1) If the attorney general determines that a violation is imminent or a person is in the process of violating the event online ticket sales act, the attorney general may bring a civil action to restrain, enjoin, or prevent the person from violating or continuing to violate the event online ticket sales act. (2) If the attorney general determines that a person has violated the event online ticket sales act, the attorney general may bring a civil action against the person for appropriate relief, including injunctive relief or to collect the civil fine as provided for under section 5. The attorney general may also recover restitution. (3) A person that violates a court order or injunction issued to enforce the event online ticket sales act is subject to a civil fine of not more than $5,000.00. Sec. 9. The court may allow the attorney general to recover reasonable costs and attorney fees incurred in an action resulting in the imposition of a civil fine under this act. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 158 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor